District of Columbia statutes.
16-1362

Fixing date for new trial; new jurors.

If a verdict rendered pursuant to section 16-1361 , or any award contained therein, is set aside or vacated, the court shall —

(1)

grant a new trial with respect to the property as to which the verdict or award is set aside or vacated;

(2)

fix a date for the new trial; and

(3)

order a new panel of prospective jurors to be drawn, certified, or summoned as provided by section 16-1357.

The court shall then proceed with the cause as if a verdict or award had not been rendered.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-1362.
1973 Ed., § 16-1362.

Prior Codifications